Hawaii statutes.
[§354D-15] Sale of goods. It shall be
unlawful to sell, or offer for sale, on the open market of this State, any
articles or products manufactured or produced, wholly or in part, under this
chapter. Goods or services produced by venture agreements under section
354D-13 shall be exempt from this limitation. [L 1990, c 341, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol07_Ch0346-0398
Next